District of Columbia statutes.
31-5604.03

Additional exemptions.

The Commissioner may, by rule or order, exempt any other security or transaction or class of securities or transactions from § 31-5603.01, § 31-5603.07, or § 31-5604.05. The Commissioner may, by rule or order, adopt a limited offering transactional exemption that will further the objectives of compatibility with the exemptions from securities registration under the Securities Act of 1933 and uniformity among the states.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 403, 47 DCR 7837
This section is referenced in § 31-5604.06.